Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Automated Central Budget Information System

48.950.
Continuous budget information system — Contents — Responsibility for.

In order to effectuate the constitutional power and duty of the General Assembly to raise and appropriate revenue and approve and adopt a balanced budget, and in order that members and committees of the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission may be informed on a continuous basis about current and prospective financial conditions and budgetary needs of the Commonwealth and its budget units, the Kentucky General Assembly finds and declares that uniform detailed budget data and records relating to expenditures, receipts and activities and the budgetary operations of all budget units must be available in electronic and print form to the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission on a continuous and timely basis.

The contents of all electronic and print forms, records, data and procedures established under KRS

48.955

and

48.960

shall pertain to:

The submission of budget unit requests and branch budget recommendations;

The adoption of budget bills;

The allotments under, and authorized adjustments and revisions to, the enacted budget;

The receipts and disbursements of budget funds pursuant to appropriations enacted by the General Assembly; and

The financial and budgetary conditions of the Commonwealth and branch budget units.

These contents, forms and records shall be standard and uniform for all budget units.

The Governor, the Chief Justice and the Legislative Research Commission for their respective branches and budget units, shall cause to be created, maintained and transmitted in electronic form the data, records and procedures necessary to fulfill the intent and purposes of KRS

48.955

and

48.960

and which may be provided by KRS

48.955

and

48.960

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 3, § 1, effective February 10, 1988.

48.955.
System to be prescribed by Legislative Research Commission — Data germane to appropriations to be included — Schedule for transmission of information — Availability of data — Reports.

The Legislative Research Commission, or its designee, shall prescribe standard electronic and print forms, records, data elements, guidelines, and instructions to be used by all branches and budget units. Such electronic and printed detailed records shall be made available and transmitted by the heads of each branch of government, or their designees, on a continuous and timely basis, in the form and technology used by the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission through electronic data processing procedures.

Representatives designated by the Governor, Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission for their respective branches shall assist, upon request, the Legislative Research Commission in the creation and maintenance of an automated central budget information system which shall consist of uniform electronic detailed records concerning appropriations, expenditures, receipts, and activities;

This system shall include all data germane to the appropriations of current and prospective budgetary resources and funds, including personnel-related data;

Preliminary work papers shall not be considered germane; however, all documentation upon which final budget decisions are made shall be considered germane and shall be included in the system.

Each branch of government shall transmit the prescribed forms, records, and detailed data authorized under KRS

48.950

to

48.960

on such schedule and dates as may be determined necessary by the General Assembly, the Legislative Research Commission or their appropriations committees or budget review committees.

The Legislative Research Commission shall make available the contents and data contained on electronic records in the automated central budget information system, upon request, to each branch of government.

At the request of the General Assembly, the Legislative Research Commission or their appropriations committees and budget review committees, the Legislative Research Commission shall issue a report, in electronic or print form, on the current and prospective budget condition and operations of the Commonwealth and its branch budget units.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 3, § 2, effective February 10, 1988.

48.960.
Conflicting provisions superseded — Electronic imprint data as additional data — Ownership of data.

KRS

48.950

and

48.955

shall supersede all other provisions in law which may be in conflict, including but not limited to KRS Chapters 6, 7, 11, 12, 15, 18 and 18A, 27A, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 47, 48, 56, 58, 131, 152, 157, 164, 171, 174, and 177.

Data and records in electronic or print form which are authorized under KRS

48.950

and

48.955

shall be in addition to all other data, records and forms which may be provided by law, including but not limited to, KRS

42.005

to

42.990

,

45.001

to

45.991

, and

48.010

to

48.800

.

The General Assembly declares that:

All data collected by or in the custody of any budget unit resulting from the expenditure of appropriated funds and which is not confidential under law shall be deemed to be the property right of the Commonwealth; and

No property right or privilege of confidentiality may be asserted or maintained by such custodial budget unit for the production of public records not exempted pursuant to KRS Chapter 61 which may be created and required pursuant to KRS

48.950

and

48.955

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 3, § 3, effective February 10, 1988.